Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.250

Disability must exist when right of action accrued.

No person shall avail himself or herself of a disability unless it existed when his or her right of action accrued.

[ 2011 c 336 s 87; Code 1881 s 42; 1877 p 10 s 43; 1854 p 365 s 16; RRS s 174.]